Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3416
Incapacity of principal; determination; effect.

A determination that a principal is incapable of making health care decisions shall not be construed as a finding that the principal is incapable for any other purpose.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 16.